test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-valgei_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - valgei: # Adjective 'white / valkoinen' - full paradigm
     valgei+N+Sg+Nom: valgie
     valgei+N+Sg+Gen: valgien
     valgei+N+Sg+Acc: [valgei, valgien]
     valgei+N+Sg+Par: valgeidu
     valgei+N+Sg+Tra: valgiekse
     valgei+N+Sg+Abe: [valgiettah, valgieta]
     valgei+N+Sg+Com: valgienke
     valgei+N+Sg+Ine: valgies
     valgei+N+Sg+Ela: [valgiespäi, valgies]
     valgei+N+Sg+Ill: valgieh
     valgei+N+Sg+Ade: valgiel
     valgei+N+Sg+Abl: [valgielpäi, valgiel]
     valgei+N+Sg+All: valgiele
     valgei+N+Sg+Ess: valgiennu
     valgei+N+Sg+Ter: valgiessah
     valgei+N+Sg+Apr: valgielluo
     valgei+N+Pl+Nom: valgiet
     valgei+N+Pl+Gen: valgieloin
     valgei+N+Pl+Acc: valgiet
     valgei+N+Pl+Par: valgieloi
     valgei+N+Pl+Tra: valgieloikse
     valgei+N+Pl+Abe: [valgieloittah, valgieloita]
     valgei+N+Pl+Com: valgieloinke
     valgei+N+Pl+Ine: valgielois
     valgei+N+Pl+Ela: [valgieloispäi, valgielois]
     valgei+N+Pl+Ill: valgieloih
     valgei+N+Pl+Ade: valgieloil
     valgei+N+Pl+Abl: [valgieloilpäi, valgieloil]
     valgei+N+Pl+All: valgieloile
     valgei+N+Pl+Ess: valgieloinnu
     valgei+N+Pl+Ins: valgieloin
     valgei+N+Pl+Ter: valgieloissah
     valgei+N+Pl+Apr: valgieloilluo
     valgei+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: valgeigi
     valgei+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: valgiengi
     valgei+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [valgeigi, valgiengi]
     valgei+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: valgeidugi
     valgei+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: valgieksegi
     valgei+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [valgiettahgi, valgietagi]
     valgei+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: valgienkegi
     valgei+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: valgiesgi
     valgei+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [valgiespäigi, valgiesgi]
     valgei+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: valgiehgi
     valgei+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: valgielgi
     valgei+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [valgielpäigi, valgielgi]
     valgei+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: valgielegi
     valgei+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: valgiennugi
     valgei+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: valgiessahgi
     valgei+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: valgielluogi
     valgei+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: valgietgi
     valgei+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: valgieloingi
     valgei+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: valgietgi
     valgei+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: valgieloigi
     valgei+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: valgieloiksegi
     valgei+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [valgieloittahgi, valgieloitagi]
     valgei+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: valgieloinkegi
     valgei+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: valgieloisgi
     valgei+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [valgieloispäigi, valgieloisgi]
     valgei+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: valgieloihgi
     valgei+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: valgieloilgi
     valgei+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [valgieloilpäigi, valgieloilgi]
     valgei+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: valgieloilegi
     valgei+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: valgieloinnugi
     valgei+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: valgieloingi
     valgei+N+Pl+Ter+Clt/gi: valgieloissahgi
     valgei+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: valgieloilluogi
